fr: Configuration du point d'attelage: Double point de remorquage; Points de remorquage multiples (3+); Point de remorquage simple; Autre
bg-BG: Конфигурация на точките за теглене: Две точки за теглене; Множество точки за теглене (3+); Една точка за теглене; Друго
vi: Cấu hình điểm kéo: Điểm kéo kép; Nhiều điểm kéo (từ 3 trở lên); Một điểm kéo; Khác
ru: Конфигурация точки буксировки: Две точки буксировки; Несколько точек буксировки (3+); Одна точка буксировки; Другое
fi: Hinauspistekokoonpano: Kaksi vetopistettä; Useita vetopisteitä (3+); Yksi vetopiste; Muu
pl: Konfiguracja punktów holowniczych: Podwójne punkty holowania; Wiele punktów holowania (3+); Pojedynczy punkt holowania; Inna
es: Configuración del punto de remolque: Puntos de remolque dobles; Múltiples puntos de remolque (3+); Punto de remolque único; Otro
el: Διαμόρφωση σημείου ρυμούλκησης: Δύο σημεία ρυμούλκησης; Πολλαπλά σημεία ρυμούλκησης (3+); Ένα σημείο ρυμούλκησης; Άλλο
it: Configurazione del punto di traino: Due punti di traino; Punti di traino multipli (3+); Punto di traino singolo; Altro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia ťažného bodu: Dva ťažné body; Viacero ťažných bodov (3+); Jeden ťažný bod; Iné
hu: Vontatópont konfigurációja: Kettős vontatási pont; Több vontatási pont (3+); Egyetlen vontatási pont; Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace tažného bodu: Dva tažné body; Více tažných bodů (3+); Jeden tažný bod; Jiné
da: Konfiguration af trækpunkt: Dobbelte trækpunkter; Flere trækpunkter (3+); Enkelt trækpunkt; Andet
th: การกำหนดค่าจุดลากจูง: จุดลากจูงคู่; จุดลากจูงหลายจุด (3+); จุดลากจูงเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
ja: 牽引ポイント構造: デュアルトーポイント; マルチトーポイント (3点以上); シングルトーポイント; その他
ko: 토우 포인트 구성: 듀얼 견인 포인트; 다중 견인 포인트(3개 이상); 싱글 견인 포인트; 기타
nb: Konfigurasjon av slepepunkt: Doble slepepunkter; Flere slepepunkter (3+); Enkelt slepepunkt; Annet
nl: Sleeppuntconfiguratie: Dubbele trekpunten; Meerdere trekpunten (3+); Enkel trekpunt; Overige
hr-HR: Konfiguracija točke za vuču: Dvije točke vuče; Više točaka vuče (3+); Jedna točka vuče; Ostalo
pt-BR: Configuração do guincho: Pontos de reboque duplos; Múltiplos pontos de reboque (3+); Ponto de reboque único; Outros
sv: Utformning av bogserfäste: Dubbla fästpunkter; Flera fästpunkter (3+); Enkel fästpunkt; Övrigt
sl-SI: Konfiguracija vlečne točke: Dve točki vleke; Več točk vleke (3 ali več); Ena točka vleke; Drugo
zh-CN: 牵引点配置: 双牵引点; 多牵引点（3 个及以上）; 单牵引点; 其他
lt-LT: Vilkimo taško konfigūracija: Dvigubi tempimo taškai; Keli tempimo taškai (3+); Vienas tempimo taškas; Kita
en: Tow point configuration: Dual tow points; Multiple tow points (3+); Single tow point; Other
pt-PT: Configuração do ponto de reboque: Pontos de reboque duplos; Múltiplos pontos de reboque (3+); Ponto de reboque único; Outro
tr: Çekme noktası konfigürasyonu: Çift çekme noktası; Çoklu çekme noktası (3+); Tek çekme noktası; Diğer
de: Art der Schleppvorrichtung: Zwei Zugpunkte; Mehrere Zugpunkte (3+); Ein Zugpunkt; Sonstige
ro-RO: Configurație a punctelor de remorcare: Puncte duble de remorcare; Puncte multiple de remorcare (3+); Punct unic de remorcare; Altele
zh-TW: 拖車點配置: 雙拖曳點; 多拖曳點 (3 個以上); 單一拖曳點; 其他